Utah statutes.
72-5-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Responsible authority" means a private party, the state of Utah, or a
political subdivision of the state claiming rights to a highway right-of-way,
easement, or right of entry across state lands.
(2)  "Sovereign lands" has the same meaning as provided in Section 65A-1-1.
(3)  "State lands" means sovereign and trust lands, as well as all other lands
held by or on behalf of the departments, divisions, or institutions of the
state.
(4)  "Trust lands" has the same meaning as "school and institutional trust
lands" as defined in Section 53C-1-103.
